Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-149
Disciplinary action; appeal; procedure.

Any decision of the board may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 44, p. 70;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 1.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.